Utah statutes.
78A-6-802.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Guardian" has the same meaning as in Section 75-1-201.
(2)  "Minor" means a person 16 years of age or older.
(3)  "Parent" means a natural parent as defined in Section 78A-6-105.
